Hawaii statutes.
PART
VIII. TRAFFIC RECORDS

§286-171 Statewide traffic records system.
(a) There is established a statewide traffic records system. The state
director of transportation shall be responsible for the administration and
operation of the system and for this purpose shall adopt necessary rules and
regulations pursuant to chapter 91.

(b) The statewide traffic records system shall
include all traffic records of the violation bureaus of the district courts,
the circuit courts, the police departments, the county [directors of finance],
the department of health, and the department of education and all dispositions
pertaining to administrative license revocation proceedings conducted by the
administrative director of the courts. [L 1967, c 214, pt of §2; HRS §286-171;
am L 1968, c 48, §2(e); am L Sp 1977 1st, c 20, §12; am L Sp 1991, c 1, §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next